West Virginia, session 2026, HB4166.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. THE GOVERNOR. §5-1-6. Proclamation of convening the Legislature into special session; providing prior notice to legislators of the convening of the Legislature into special session. The proclamation of the convening of the Legislature by the governor shall be issued not less than five days prior to the convening of the Legislature into special session. The governor shall provide not less than 5 days' prior notice to all state legislators when calling a special session of the Legislature.